North Carolina, session 2025, HB1022.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina the nonrecurring sum of one hundred ninety-six thousand
seven hundred sixty dollars ($196,760) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to the
Department of Parks, Recreation and Tourism Management in the College of Natural Resources
at North Carolina State University for the creation and evaluation of a community-based wellness
initiative in eastern Wake, Halifax, and Lenoir Counties. Funds appropriated in this section shall
not revert but shall remain available for the purposes provided herein.
The purpose of the initiative is to increase physical activity, strengthen social
connections, and improve psychosocial well-being in communities with limited access to
recreational resources. The program will use pickleball as a low-cost, accessible tool to engage
participants and encourage regular physical activity and social interaction through public
recreational facilities. Halifax and Lenoir Counties were selected due to economic need and
community health assessments identifying limited access to safe spaces for physical activity as a
primary concern. The initiative will build upon existing community relationships in these
counties to support effective implementation. Eastern Wake County was selected based on
population size and recent investments in recreational infrastructure.
The initiative shall be led by a designated Program Leader responsible for overall
project coordination and supported by two faculty members with expertise in health, wellness,
and physical activity who will oversee program design, implementation, evaluation, and
reporting to ensure evidence-based practices and measurable outcomes. The program team will
collaborate with North Carolina Cooperative Extension County Agents in Halifax and Lenoir
Counties to support local coordination, participant recruitment, and program delivery.
The initiative shall be implemented and evaluated using a delayed treatment design
and shall include all of the following:
(1) Community input. – Interviews with residents to inform program design and
outreach strategies.
(2) Program development. – Creation of a branded program, including a name,
logo, and physical and digital marketing materials.
*H1022-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Marketing and outreach. – Coordination with community partners, including
parks and recreation departments, churches, and Boys & Girls Clubs, using
websites, social media, direct communication, events, and demonstrations.
(4) Program delivery. – Three months of weekly pickleball instruction and
gameplay.
(5) Evaluation. – Assessment of physical activity levels, social connection, and
psychosocial outcomes.
(6) Toolkit development. – Creation of materials to support implementation of
similar programs across North Carolina.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 2 House Bill 1022-First Edition